Kentucky statutes. TITLE XLII Miscellaneous Practice Provisions
Original Venue in Criminal Proceedings

452.510.
Criminal prosecutions.

Unless otherwise provided by law, the venue of criminal prosecutions and penal actions is in the county or city in which the offense was committed.

History.

1145: reen. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 32.

452.520.
River or road dividing counties.

Where any part of a river, watercourse, highway, road or street constitutes the boundary line between two (2) counties, the venue is in both counties for the prosecution of crimes committed over the whole extent of such part of the river, watercourse, highway, road, street or any island in the river.

History.

1143: reen. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 36.

452.530.
Rivers along state boundary.

The venue of prosecutions for crimes committed on the Mississippi, Ohio, Big Sandy or Tennessee Rivers is in any of the counties bordering on the same river.

History.

1144: reen. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 38.

452.540.
Person in one county, offense in another.

Where a person in one county commits an offense in another county the trial may be in either county.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 48.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where a couple was divorced in one county and the husband was ordered to pay child support, the county to which the wife and children moved had venue to issue a warrant under KRS

405.030

(now repealed).

OAG 63-843

.

452.550.
Offense partly in one county and partly in another.

Where an offense is committed partly in one and partly in another county, or if acts and their effects constituting an offense occur in different counties, the prosecution may be in either county in which any of such acts occurs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 49.

452.560.
Injury in one county, death in another.

Where an injury is inflicted or poison is administered in one county and death ensues in another, the trial for the homicide may be in either county.

History.

1147: reen. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 40.

452.570.
Accessory in one county, offense committed in another.

Where a person in one county aids, abets or procures the commission of an offense in another county he may be tried for the offense in either county.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 50.

452.580.
Property unlawfully obtained in one county, brought through another.

Where a person obtains property by larceny, robbery, false pretenses or embezzlement in one county and brings the property so obtained into or through any other county, he may be tried in the county in which he obtains the property or in any other county into or through which he brings it.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 51.

452.590.
Property transported into state.

Where the offense consists of transporting any property into the Commonwealth, the venue of the prosecution is in the county into or through which the property has been transported.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 52.

452.600.
Kidnapping, seizing or confining person.

Where the offense consists of kidnapping, seizing or confining a person without lawful authority, the prosecution may be in any county in which the person is seized or confined or through or into which he has been carried or brought.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 53.

452.610.
Publishing libelous matter in newspaper.

Prosecutions against persons publishing a newspaper for any libelous matter contained therein may be in the county where the same is printed and issued, or in the county where the party complaining resides.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 54.

452.620.
Doubt as to where offense committed.

When there is a reasonable doubt as to whether the offense was committed in the county in which an indictment has been returned or in some other county, the venue of the prosecution is in the county in which the indictment was returned.

History.

1146: reen. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 34.

452.630.
Prosecution where process for arrest first issued.

Where the venue of a prosecution is in two (2) or more counties, the prosecution shall proceed in the county in which the process for the arrest of the defendant is first issued, unless an indictment for the offense is pending in another county.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 55.

452.650.
Waiver of venue.

The venue of the prosecution may be waived by the defendant and the failure to make a timely motion to transfer the prosecution to the proper county shall be deemed a waiver of the venue of the prosecution.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 56.